src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
* **+Der/xxx** 
* **+Der**  In front of every derivation to make it   possible to target derivations as a class e.g. in regular expressions etc 
* **+Der/La** 
* **+Der/Ан**  Process Participle +AN
* **+Der/Ана** Process Participle +ANA, Gerund or participle according to context (with...)
* **+Der/Анаа**  adverb derived from participle (+ANA) +ANAA
* **+Der/чӧж**  +CHOZH
* **+Der/тӧг** 
* **+Der/Abe** тӧм should take +A, see also +VAbess
* **+Der/Patr** patronymics in Russian
* **+Instr** 
* **+NomAct**
* **+Der/NomAct**  +Event
* **+Der/NomAg** 
* **+Duration**
* **+Der/иг**
* **+Der/Ig**
* **+Der/IgKezhlo**
* **+Der/IgKosta**
* **+Der/IgKosti**
* **+Der/IgMoz** %{иі%}гмоз
* **+Der/IgonMoz** %{иі%}гӧнмоз
* **+Der/IgSor** %{иі%}гсор
* **+Der/IgTyr** %{иі%}гтыр
* **+Der/IgTyrji** %{иі%}гтырйи
* **+Der/IgTyrja** %{иі%}гтыръя
* **+Der/IgChozh**%{иі%}гчӧж
* **+Der/ысь**
* **+ActPrsPtc** 
* **+PrsPrc**
* **+PrsPtc** 
* **+PastPtc** 
* **+Der/кості**  +KOSTI
* **+Der/коста**  +KOSTA
* **+Der/кежлӧ**  +KEZHLO
* **+Der/мысь**  +MYS
* **+Der/мысьт**  +MYST
* **+Der/сор**  = +SOR
* **+Der/тыр**  = +TYR
* **+Der/тырйи**  = +TYRJI
* **+Der/тыръя**  = +TYRJA
* **+Der/мӧн**  = +MON
* **+Der/мӧнъя**  = Ӧнія коми кыв. 2000: 399-403
* **+Der/ӧмӧн**  = +OMON !Ӧнія коми кыв. 2000: 425

Declaring adjectival derivations
Noun phrase modifiers are generally considered derivational 

#### More dertags (TODO: sort/group)
*  **+MAbe** abessive modifier -тӧм 
*  **+MLoc** locative modifier са -
*  **+MHab** habeo modifier а -
*  **+MTmp** temporal modifier ся -
* **+Der/ProprietiveMod** = +Der/APrior  Denominal prioritive adjective Der/а
* **+Der/PrivMod** = тӧм
* **+Der/а** 
* **+Der/са** 
* **+Der/ся** 
* **+Der/Иник** 
* **+Der/Ин** 
* **+Der/увса** 
* **+Der/сайса** 
* **+Der/пӧвстса** 
* **+Der/костса** 
* **+Der/бердса** 
* **+Der/бӧрса** 
* **+Der/весьтса** 
* **+Der/водзса** 
* **+Der/вывса** 
* **+Der/гӧгӧрса** 
* **+Der/дорса** 
* **+Loc** LocMod, IneMod Быд во шедӧдӧны бур успеваемость Воркута да Инта каръясса, Прилузскӧй да Княжпогостскӧй районъясса школаяс.
* **+LocMod** move to Loc
* **+CompMod** 
* **+Der/тӧм**  used with nouns and followed by +AbeMod
* **+Abe** PrivMod, AbeMod джуджыд анализъястӧм да обобщениеястӧм статьяяс.
* **+PrivMod** move to Abe
* **+Prp** ProprietiveMod, HabObjMod Весиг киясыс тӧдсаӧсь, найӧ мугов рӧмаӧсь, кузь чорыд чуньясаӧсь.
* **+ProprietiveMod** move to Prp
* **+Der/TempMod** TempMod Der/ся но и Ф. В. Плесовскийлысь квайтымынӧд вояссяяссӧ * позьӧ аддзыны сӧмын библиотекаясысь.  Declaring spatial adverb derivations; see also spatial postpositions
* **+Der/ла** 
* **+Der/ладор** 
* **+Der/дор** 
* **+Der/выв** 
* **+Der/тор** 
* **+MWN**  check! used once, should it be +Der/MWN?, Well, yes.
* **+Der/MWN** 
* **+Der/мед**  Superlative
* **+Der/сюрӧ +Der/кӧ**  !Declaring Indefinite Pronoun derivations
* **+Der/моз** +MOZ  diminishing, kind of, sort of
* **+Der/кодь** diminishing, kind of, sort of
* **+Der/лун**  adjective-to-noun
* **+Der/ӧм**  verb-to-noun   !Declaring Indefinite Pronoun derivations the combinatory +Event preceding the NP-final noun

#### Declaring Deverbal derivations of verbs
* **+Der/л** 
* **+Der/лы** 
* **+Der/ывлы** 
* **+Der/ышт** 
* **+Der/лывлы** 
* **+Der/сь**  This only occurs following a vowel in an yny-stem 2017-09-19+Der/сь
* **+Der/сьы**  2017-09-19+Der/ч ! This appears to be a variant of +Der/сьы; it follows plosives
* **+Der/чы**  This appears to be a variant of +Der/сьы; it follows plosives
* **+Der/ал** 
* **+Der/овт** 
* **+Der/ась** 
* +Der/N Noun derived with conversion from noun, conversion but not ZERO
* +Der/A Adjective derivated from Noun or Verb
* +Der/Adv Adverb derivated from Adjective

#### Tags for Ethymological Origin marking. This has initially used used with proper nouns
* **+EOLang/BXR** 
* **+EOLang/CHM** 
* **+EOLang/KOI** 
* **+EOLang/KOM** 
* **+EOLang/KPV** 
* **+EOLang/MHR** 
* **+EOLang/MRJ** 
* **+EOLang/MDF** 
* **+EOLang/MYV** 
* **+EOLang/RUS** 
* **+EOLang/YRK** 

### Morphophonology

To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
symbols in the lexicon files:

#### Archiphonemes

* **{aä}**:  Vowel alternating symbol
* **{oö}**:  Vowel alternating symbol 
* **{uü}**:  Vowel alternating symbol
* **%^к2 %^л2 %^м2 %^т2 %^ь2 %^К2 %^Л2 %^М2 %^Т2 %^Ь2 %^И2**
* **%^V1       ** for reduplicated vowel унаӧн > унаан
* **%>**  suffix border
* **%{иі%}**:  for soft and hard
* **%{ая%}**:  for soft and hard

#### Triggers to control variation
* **{front}**:  Vowel change triggers
* **{back}**:  Vowel change triggers
* **%^Close** Close syllable, this triggers final consonant drop, seen in word-final position and before consonant
* **%^C2V   ** Consonant v to vowel, Izhva ныы, ооны

#### Valency tags, i.e. tags assigned to verbs for denoting their arbuments

* **+%<acc%>** accusative
* **+%<ela%>** elative -ысь
* **+%<ins%>** instrumental -ӧн
* **+%<inf_ны%>** infinitive in -ны
* **+%<po_вылӧ%>** postposition вылӧ
* **+%<sub_мый%>** subordinate clause in мый/that

### Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):

* »
* «
* \> (written with square brackets, see the root.lexc file)
* < (written with square brackets, see the root.lexc file)

## Flag diacritics

We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:

| Flags | Explanation 
| ----- | ----------- 
|  **@P.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  **@D.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  **@C.NeedNoun@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

Two flags copied from sme

| Flags | Explanation 
| ----- | ----------- 
|  **@P.Pmatch.Loc@** | Used on multi-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch where in the form/analysis the token should be split.
|  **@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@** | Used on single-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch to backtrack by reanalysing the substrings before and after this point in the form (to find combinations of shorter analyses that would otherwise be missed)

### Compunding

#### Tags
* **+Cmp**
*  +Cmp/Serial used with serial verbs
* **+Cmp/SplitR** 

#### Flags 

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is

handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.

| Flags | Explanation 
| ----- | ----------- 
| **@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@** | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
| **@D.CmpPref.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
| **@P.CmpPref.FALSE@** | Block these words from making further compounds
| **@D.CmpLast.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering R
| **@D.CmpNone.TRUE@** | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
| **@U.CmpNone.FALSE@** | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
| **@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@** | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
| **@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@** | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

| Flags | Explanation 
| ----- | ----------- 
| **@U.Cap.Obl@** | Always capital letter for names: Deatnu.
| **@U.Cap.Opt@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

| Flags | Explanation 
| ----- | ----------- 
| **@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@** | Flags used with serial verbs: VAL = Valence
| **@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@** | Flags used with serial verbs: VAL = Valence
| **@U.CONJ-INF.YES@** |  INF = Infinitive
| **@U.CONJ-INF.NO@** |  INF = Infinitive
| **@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@** |  TX = tense
| **@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@** |  TX = tense
| **@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@** |  TX = tense
| **@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@** |  TX = tense
| **@U.CONJ-GER.IG@** |  GER = gerund
| **@U.CONJ-GER.VCAR@** |  GER = VCar тӧг
| **@U.CONJ-GER.VCARMoz@** |  GER = VCar тӧгмоз
| **@U.CONJ-GER.VMON@** |  GER = VMon мӧн
| **@U.CONJ-GER.VTER@** |  GER = VTer тӧдз
| **@U.CONJ-MX.IND@** | MX = mood
| **@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@** | MX = mood
| **@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@** | CONNEG = negation
| **@U.CONJ-CONNEG.NO@** | CONNEG = negation
| **@U.CONJ-NX.PL@** | NX = number
| **@U.CONJ-NX.SG@** | NX = number
| **@U.CONJ-POSS.1@** | POSS = possessive, person 1
| **@U.CONJ-POSS.2@** | POSS = possessive 2
| **@U.CONJ-POSS.3@** | POSS = possessive 3
| **@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@** | POSS = possessive etc.
| **@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@** | POSS = possessive
| **@U.CONJ-PX.1@** | PX = person
| **@U.CONJ-PX.2@** | PX = person
| **@U.CONJ-PX.3@** | PX = person
| **@C.CONJ-VAL@** | Removal
| **@C.CONJ-INF@** | Removal
| **@C.CONJ-TX@** | Removal
| **@C.CONJ-MX@** | Removal
| **@C.CONJ-GER@** | Removal
| **@C.CONJ-CONNEG@** | Removal
| **@C.CONJ-NX@** | Removal
| **@C.CONJ-PX@** | Removal
| **@C.CONJ-POSS@** | Removal
| **@P.PossPx.Sg1@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@P.PossPx.Sg2@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@P.PossPx.Sg3@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@P.PossPx.Pl1@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@P.PossPx.Pl2@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@P.PossPx.Pl3@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@U.PossPx.Sg1@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@U.PossPx.Sg2@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@U.PossPx.Sg3@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@U.PossPx.Pl1@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@U.PossPx.Pl2@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@U.PossPx.Pl3@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@D.PossPx@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@C.PossPx@** | FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
| **@U.DECL-NX.SG@** | number
| **@U.DECL-NX.PL@** | number
| **@R.DECL-NX.PL@** | number
| **@U.DECL-CX.ABE@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.ABL@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.ACC@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.APR@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.APRINE@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.APRILL@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.APRELA@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.APREGR@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.APRPRL@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.APRTRA@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.APRTER@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.CAR@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.CMP@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.CNS@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.COM@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.DAT@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.EGR@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.ELA@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.GEN@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.ILL@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.INE@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.INS@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.NOM@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.PRL@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.TRA@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-CX.TER@** | unify case
| **@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@** | declension type
| **@U.DECL-DX.PX@** | declension type
| **@C.DECL-NX@** | Removal
| **@C.DECL-DX@** | Removal
| **@C.DECL-CX@** | Removal
| **@U.Cap.Obl@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj
| **@U.Cap.Opt@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj

## Lexicon Root
